Wisconsin, session 2025, AB435.
do enact as follows:AB435,11Section 1. 15.07 (3) (bm) 1. of the statutes is created to read:AB435,2,3215.07 (3) (bm) 1. The Knowles-Nelson stewardship board shall meet at least 3quarterly.AB435,24Section 2. 15.345 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB435,2,7515.345 (4) Knowles-Nelson stewardship board. (a) There is created a 6Knowles-Nelson stewardship board attached to the department of natural resources 7under s. 15.03.AB435,2,98(b) The board shall be composed of the following members appointed for 9staggered 3-year terms:AB435,2,11101. One member who is a representative to the assembly, nominated by the 11majority leader of the assembly.AB435,2,13122. One member who is a representative to the assembly, nominated by the 13minority leader of the assembly.AB435,2,15143. One member who is a senator, nominated by the majority leader of the 15senate.AB435,2,17164. One member who is a senator, nominated by the minority leader of the 17senate.AB435,2,19185. Two members who represent environmental organizations or nonprofit 19conservation organizations, as defined under s. 23.0955 (1), in this state.AB435,2,21206. Two members who each represent organizations that represent hunting, 21fishing, or trapping interests in this state.AB435,2,23227. Two members who represent the department of natural resources, 23including one member of the natural resources board.AB435,3,218. One member who represents the office of outdoor recreation in the 2department of tourism. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab435 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab435 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB435 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB435 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB435: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting